Utah statutes.
53A-13-101.3.   Expressions of belief -- Discretionary time.

(1)  Expression of personal beliefs by a student participating in school-directed curricula or activities may not be prohibited or penalized unless the expression unreasonably interferes with order or discipline, threatens the well-being of persons or property, or violates concepts of civility or propriety appropriate to a school setting.

(2) (a)  As used in this section, "discretionary time" means noninstructional time during which a student is free to pursue personal interests.

(b)  Free exercise of voluntary religious practice or freedom of speech by students during discretionary time shall not be denied unless the conduct unreasonably interferes with the ability of school officials to maintain order and discipline, unreasonably endangers persons or property, or violates concepts of civility or propriety appropriate to a school setting.

(3)  Any limitation under Sections 53A-13-101.2 and 53A-13-101.3 on student expression, practice, or conduct shall be by the least restrictive means necessary to satisfy the school's interests as stated in those sections, or to satisfy another specifically identified compelling governmental interest.



Enacted by Chapter 95, 1993 General Session

